Wisconsin, session 2025, AB985.
do enact as follows:AB985,14Section 1. 66.0602 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB985,2,11166.0602 (1) (d) “Valuation factor” means a percentage equal to the greater of 2either the percentage change in the political subdivision’s January 1 equalized 3value due to new construction less improvements removed between the previous 4year and the current the annual development percentage calculated under sub. (2g) 5or 0 percent. For a tax incremental district created after December 31, 2024, and 6for Tax Incremental District Number 10 created by the common council of the city of 7Evansville, and for Tax Incremental District Number 14 created by the common 8council of the city of Stevens Point, the valuation factor includes 90 percent of the 9equalized value increase due to new construction that is located in a tax 10incremental district, but does not include any improvements removed in a tax 11incremental district.AB985,212Section 2. 66.0602 (2g) of the statutes is created to read:AB985,2,191366.0602 (2g) Calculation of valuation factor. (a) “Qualifying parking lot 14redevelopment” means the construction of one or more commercial, multifamily 15residential, or mixed-use buildings on a parcel, or on 2 or more adjacent parcels 16under common ownership or control, where, in the taxation year of the permit 17application, at least 40 percent of the combined parcel area was devoted to paved 18surface vehicle parking that was in use and taxed as part of the assessed value of 19the parcels, as of January of the prior year.AB985,2,2320(b) Except as provided in par. (c), the annual development percentage of a 21political subdivision is the percentage change in the political subdivision’s January 221 equalized value due to new construction less improvements removed between the 23previous year and the current year.AB985,3,624(c) 1. For a tax incremental district created after December 31, 2024, and for 1Tax Incremental District Number 10 created by the common council of the city of 2Evansville, and for Tax Incremental District Number 14 created by the common 3council of the city of Stevens Point, the annual development percentage includes 90 4percent of the equalized value increase due to new construction that is located in a 5tax incremental district, but does not include any improvements removed in a tax 6incremental district.AB985,3,1172. If qualifying parking lot redevelopment occurred in a political subdivision 8between the previous year and the current year, any increase in equalized value due 9to the qualifying parking lot redevelopment multiplied by 1.5 is added to the 10equalized value due to new construction when calculating the annual development 11percentage of the political subdivision.AB985,312Section 3. Effective date.AB985,3,1313(1) This act takes effect on the January 1 after publication.AB985,3,1414